Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.25.080

Instituting or maintaining proceedings—Shareholders only.

(1) No proceeding may be instituted or maintained in the right of any social purpose corporation under this title by any party other than a shareholder of the social purpose corporation.

(2) A person may not commence a proceeding in the right of a social purpose corporation unless the person was a shareholder of the corporation when the transaction complained of occurred or unless the person became a shareholder through transfer by operation of law from one who was a shareholder at that time.

(3) Any proceeding instituted or maintained in the right of a social purpose corporation must comply with the procedure set forth in RCW 23B.07.400.

[ 2012 c 215 s 9.]